pt-PT: Material das cerdas: Texugo; Cerdas de javali; Algodão; Couro falso; Cabra; Porco; Crina de cavalo; Pele; Linho; Metal; Microfibra; Cerda natural; Náilon; Plástico; Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Pónei; Borracha; Marta; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Cerdas sintéticas; Teflon; Desconhecido; Madeira; Outro
es: Material de las cerdas: Tejón; Cerdas de jabalí; Algodón; Cuero sintético; Cabra; Cerdo; Horsehair; Cuero; Lino; Metal; Microfibra; Cerdas naturales; Nylon; Plástico; Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Pony; Goma; Sable; Silicona; Acero inoxidable; Cerda sintética; Teflón; Desconocido; Madera; Otros
pt-BR: Material das cerdas: Texugo; Cerdas de javali; Algodão; Couro falso; Cabra; Porco; Pelo de cavalo; Couro; Linho; Metal; Microfibra; Cerdas naturais; Nylon; Plástico; Polipropileno (PP); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Pônei; Borracha; Zibelina; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Cerdas sintéticas; Teflon; Desconhecido; Madeira; Outro
tr: Kıl malzemesi: Porsuk; Yaban domuzu kılı; Pamuk; Suni deri; Keçi; Domuz; At saçı; Deri; Keten; Metal; Mikrofiber; Doğal kıl; Plastik; Plastik; Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Pony; Kauçuk; Samur; Silikon; Paslanmaz çelik; Sentetik kıl; Teflon; Bilinmeyen; Ahşap; Diğer
lt-LT: Šerių medžiaga: Barsuko; Šerno šeriai; Medvilnė; Dirbtinė oda; Ožkos; Šerno; Ašutinis audinys; Oda; Lininis audinys; Metalas; Mikropluoštas; Natūralūs šereliai; Nailonas; Plastikas; Polipropilenas (PP); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Pony; Kaučiukas; Sabalo; Silikonas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Sintetiniai šereliai; Teflonas; Nežinoma; Mediena; Kita
sk-SK: Materiál štetín: Jazvec; Diviačie štetiny; Bavlna; Umelá koža; Koza; Prasa; Konské vlásie; Koža; Ľan; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Prírodná štetina; Nylon; Plast; Polypropylén (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Pony; Guma; Sobolí; Silikón; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Syntetická štetina; Teflón; Neznáme; Drevo; Iné
sv: Borstmaterial: Grävling; Vildsvinborst; Bomull; Fuskläder; Get; Svin; Hästhår; Läder; Linne; Metall; Mikrofiber; Naturliga borst; Nylon; Plast; Polypropen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Pony; Gummi; Sobel; Silikon; Rostfritt stål; Syntetborst; Teflon; Okänd; Trä; Övrigt
sl-SI: Material ščetin čopiča: Jazbec; Merjaščeve ščetine; Bombaž; Umetno usnje; Koza; Ščetine prašiča; Konjska žima; Usnje; Lan; Kovina; Mikrovlakna; Naravne ščetine; Najlon; Plastika; Polipropilen (PP); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Pony; Guma; Cibetovka; Silikon; Nerjavno jeklo; Sintetične ščetine; Teflon; Neznano; Les; Drugo
nb: Bustmateriale: Grevling; Villsvinbust; Bomull; Kunstig lær; Geit; Gris; Horsehair; Skinn; Lin; Metall; Mikrofiber; Naturlig bust; Nylon; Plast; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Ponni; Gummi; Sobel; Silikon; Rustfritt stål; Syntetisk bust; Teflon; Ukjent; Trevirke; Annet
th: วัสดุสำหรับขนแข็ง: แบดเจอร์; ขนหมูป่า; สำลี; หนังเทียม; แพะ; หมู; ขนม้า; หนัง; ผ้าลินิน; โลหะ; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; ขนแข็งธรรมชาติ; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); ม้าโพนี่; ยาง; เซเบิล; ซิลิโคน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; ขนสังเคราะห์; เทฟลอน; ไม่ทราบ; ไม้; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 剛毛材質: 獾; 野猪鬃; 棉布; 人造皮; 山羊; 野豬; 馬毛; 皮製; 亞麻; 金屬; 超細纖維; 天然猪鬃; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 經濟型小車; 橡膠; 紫貂; 矽膠; 不銹鋼; 人造鬃毛; Teflon; 未知; 木材; 其他
en: Bristle material: Badger; Boar bristle; Cotton; Faux leather; Goat; Hog; Horsehair; Leather; Linen; Metal; Microfiber; Natural bristle; Nylon; Plastic; Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Pony; Rubber; Sable; Silicone; Stainless steel; Synthetic bristle; Teflon; Unknown; Wood; Other
fr: Matériau des poils: Blaireau; Soie de sanglier; Coton; Faux cuir; Chèvre; Porc; Crin de cheval; Cuir; Lin; Métal; Microfibre; Poils naturels; Nylon; Plastique; Polypropylène (PP); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Poney; Caoutchouc; Zibeline; Silicone; Acier inoxydable; Poil synthétique; Téflon; Inconnu; Bois; Autre
ja: 毛の材質: アナグマ; 猪毛; コットン; フェイクレザー; ヤギ; ホッグ; ホースヘア; レザー; リネン; 金属; マイクロファイバー; 天然毛; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリプロピレン (PP); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ポニー; ゴム; セーブル; シリコーン; ステンレススチール; 合成毛; テフロン; 不明; 木材; その他
cs: Materiál štětin: Jezevec; Kančí štětina; Bavlna; Nepravá kůže; Koza; Prase; Koňské žíně; Kůže; Len; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Přírodní štětiny; Nylon; Plast; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Veterán Pony; Guma; Sobol; Silikon; Nerezová ocel; Syntetická štětina; Teflon; Stav neznámý; Dřevo; Jiné
fi: Harjasten materiaali: Mäyrä; Villisian harjakset; Puuvilla; Keinonahka; Vuohi; Sika; Jouhi; Nahka; Pellava; Metalli; Mikrokuitu; Luonnollinen harjas; Nailon; Muovi; Polypropeeni (PP); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Poni; Kumi; Soopeli; Silikoni; Ruostumaton teräs; Synteettiset harjakset; Teflon; Tuntematon; Puu; Muu
hu: Sörte anyaga: Borz; Vaddisznósörte; Pamut; Műbőr; Kecske; Vaddisznó; Lószőr; Bőr; Lenvászon; Fém; Mikroszálas; Természetes sörte; Nejlon; Műanyag; Polipropilén (PP); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Póni; Gumi; Coboly; Szilikon; Rozsdamentes acél; Szintetikus sörte; Teflon; Ismeretlen; Fa; Egyéb
ru: Материал ворса: Барсук; Свиная щетина; Хлопок; Искусственная кожа; Коза; Кабан; Конский волос; Кожа; Лен; Металл; Микрофибра; Натуральная щетина; Нейлон; Пластик; Полипропилен (ПП); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Спортивный дизайн; Резина; Соболь; Силикон; Нержавеющая сталь; Синтетическая щетина; Тефлон; Неизвестно; Дерево; Другое
de: Borstenmaterial: Dachs; Wildschweinborsten; Baumwolle; Kunstleder; Ziege; Schwein; Horsehair; Leder; Leinen; Metall; Mikrofaser; Naturborste; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Pony; Gummi; Zobel; Silikon; Edelstahl; Synthetische Borste; Teflon; Unbekannt; Holz; Sonstiges
el: Υλικό από τρίχες: Τρίχα ασβού; Τρίχα αγριογούρουνου; Βαμβάκι; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Κατσίκα; Τρίχα χοίρου; Αλογότριχες; Δέρμα; Λινό; Μέταλλο; Μικροΐνες; Φυσική τρίχα; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Πόνυ; Καουτσούκ; Τρίχα σαμούρ; Σιλικόνη; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Συνθετική τρίχα; Τεφλόν; Άγνωστο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
da: Børstemateriale: Grævling; ildsvinebørstehår; Bomuld; Kunstigt læder; Ged; Gris; Horsehair; Læder; Linned; Metal; Mikrofiber; Naturlige børster; Nylon; Plast; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Pony; Gummi; Zobel; Silikone; Rustfrit stål; Syntetiske børstehår; Teflon; Ukendt; Træ; Andet
ro-RO: Material peri: Bursuc; Peri de mistreț; Bumbac; Imitație de piele; Capră; Porc (peri de porc); Horsehair; Piele; In; Metal; Microfiber; Păr natural; Nailon; Plastic; Polipropilenă (PP); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Pony; Cauciuc; Sable / samur (peri de samur); Silicon; Oțel inoxidabil; Peri sintetici; Teflon; Necunoscut; Lemn; Altele
pl: Materiał włosia: Borsucze; Włosie dzika; Bawełna; Skaj; Koza; Świńskie; Włosie końskie; Skórzane; Bielizna pościelowa; Metal; Mikrofibra; Naturalne włosie; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Polipropylen (PP); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Pony; Guma; Sobole; Silikon; Stal nierdzewna; Włosie syntetyczne; Teflon; Nieznana; Drewno; Inne
nl: Borstelhaarmateriaal: Das; Varkenshaar; Katoen; Kunstleer; Geit; Varken; Paardenhaar; Leer; Linnen; Metaal; Microvezel; Natuurlijke borstelharen; Nylon; Plastic; Polypropyleen (PP); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Pony; Rubber; Sabel; Siliconen; Roestvrij staal; Syntetishce borstel; Teflon; Onbekend; Hout; Andere
hr-HR: Materijal iglica: Jazavac; Čekinje vepra; Pamuk; Umjetna koža; Koza; Svinja; Konjska dlaka; Koža; Lan; Metal; Mikrovlakna; Prirodne čekinje; Najlon; Plastika; Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Poni; Guma; Samur; Silikon; Nehrđajući čelik; Sintetičke čekinje; Teflon; Nepoznato; Drvo; Ostalo
bg-BG: Материал на косъма: Язовец; Четина от глиган; Памук; Изкуствена кожа; Козе; Свиня; Конски косъм; Кожа; Лен; Метал; Микрофибър; Естествен косъм; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полипропилен (PP); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Пони; Каучук; Самур; Силикон; Неръждаема стомана; Синтетичен косъм; Тефлон; Неизвестен; Дърво; Други
zh-CN: 刷毛材质: 獾毛; 野猪鬃; 棉布; 人造皮革; 山羊毛; 猪鬃; 马鬃; 皮革; 亚麻; 金属; 超细纤维; 天然鬃毛; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 小马鬃; 橡胶; 貂毛; 硅胶; 不锈钢; 合成鬃; Teflon; 未知; 木头; 其他
it: Materiale delle setole: Tasso; Setola di cinghiale; Cotone; Ecopelle; Capra; Maiale; Crine di cavallo; Pelle; Lino; Metallo; Microfibra; Setola naturale; Nylon; Plastica; Polipropilene (PP); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Pony; Gomma; Zibellino; Silicone; Acciaio inossidabile; Setola sintetica; Teflon; Sconosciuto; Legno; Altro
vi: Chất liệu lông: Lửng; Lông heo rừng; Vải bông; Da giả; Dê; Lợn thiến; Lông ngựa; Da; Lanh; Kim loại; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Lông cứng tự nhiên; Nylon; Nhựa; Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Ngựa con; Cao su; Chồn zibelin; Silicon; Thép không gỉ; Lông tổng hợp; Chân may Teflon; Không rõ; Gỗ; Khác
ko: 모 소재: 오소리; 멧돼지 강모; 면; 인조 가죽; 염소; 돼지; 말총; 가죽; 린넨; 금속; 극세사; 천연 강모; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 포니; 고무; 담비; 실리콘; 스테인리스 스틸; 합성모; Teflon; 알려지지 않은; 목재; 기타